Idaho, session 2026, H0869.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Idaho Commission for the Blind and
Visually Impaired the following amounts to be expended according to the des-
ignated expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026,
through June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
OPERATING BENEFIT
EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
FROM:
RehabilitationRevenueandRefunds
Fund $34,300 $28,400 $62,700
Adaptive Aids and Appliances
Fund 65,000 0 65,000
TOTAL $99,300 $28,400 $127,700
SECTION 2. SERVICE PRIORITIZATION. It is hereby the intent of the Leg-
islature that the Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired prioritize
funding provided in Section 1 of this act to provide sight restoration ser-
vices to preserve, stabilize, and restore vision for eligible individuals.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.